Florida, session 2026, HB127.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (w) is added to subsection (2) of
section 1003.42, Florida Statutes, to read:
1003.42 Required instruction.—
(2) Members of the instructional staff of the public
schools, subject to the rules of the State Board of Education
and the district school board, shall teach efficiently and
faithfully, using the books and materials required that meet the
highest standards for professionalism and historical accuracy,
following the prescribed courses of study, and employing
approved methods of instruction, the following:
(w)1. For students in grades 2 through 5, the study of
cursive writing and the development of the skills necessary for
legible cursive writing, including:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb127-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 127 2026
a. Letter formation.
b. Proper spacing and alignment.
c. Practice in writing complete words and sentences in
cursive.
2. By the end of grade 5, each student must demonstrate
proficiency in cursive writing through an evaluation of written
work. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term "proficiency
in cursive writing" means all of the following:
a. The ability to write uppercase and lowercase letters of
the alphabet in cursive writing.
b. Writing words and sentences in cursive legibly and
maintaining proper spacing and alignment.
c. The ability to read and apply cursive writing in a
manner that supports literacy development, including writing
essays and assignments in cursive writing in accordance with
state academic standards.

The State Board of Education is encouraged to adopt standards
and pursue assessment of the requirements of this subsection.
Instructional programming that incorporates the values of the
recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor and that is
offered as part of a social studies, English Language Arts, or
other schoolwide character building and veteran awareness
initiative meets the requirements of paragraph (u).
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb127-00